Mississippi, session 2026, HB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-51-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-51-101.  As used in Sections 27-51-101 through 27-51-107, unless the context requires otherwise: (a)  "Private carrier of passengers" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 27-19-3, but shall not be construed to include motorcycles. (b)  "Light carrier of property" means any motor vehicle with a gross weight, as defined in Section 27-19-3, of ten thousand (10,000) pounds or less that is designed and constructed for the primary purpose of transporting property on the roads and highways. (c)  "Local taxing district" means any county, municipality, school district or other local entity that levies an ad valorem tax or for which an ad valorem tax is levied, to fund all or a portion of its budget. (d)  "State fiscal year" means the period beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 of the following year. (e) "Commission," "State Tax Commission" or "department" means the Department of Revenue. SECTION 2.  Section 27-51-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-51-103.  (1)  From and after January 1, 1995, through June 30, 1995, a taxpayer shall be allowed as a credit towards the tax liability imposed by Chapter 51, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, on the amount of ad valorem taxes due during the taxable year on any private carrier of passengers and light carrier of property owned by him, an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the assessed value of the motor vehicle. (2)  From and after July 1, 1995, a taxpayer shall be allowed as a credit against motor vehicle ad valorem taxes due under Chapter 51, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, on any private carrier of passengers and light carrier of property owned by him, an amount as provided for in subsection (3) of this section. (3)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, from and after July 1, 1995, the amount of the credit that a taxpayer shall be allowed against motor vehicle ad valorem taxes due under Chapter 51, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be determined by the State Tax Commission for each fiscal year. The amount of the credit shall be promulgated by the commission on or before May 1 prior to each state fiscal year beginning with the state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 1995.  In developing the credit, the commission shall establish credit amounts that provide for an equal percentage of dollar credit amounts for private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property in proportion to their assessed value, based on the projected amount of funds in the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund that will be available for distribution in such state fiscal year.  The commission may calculate the credit in such a manner so as to have surplus funds available in the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund for cash-flow needs and monthly shortfalls that might be incurred as a result of unexpected revenue fluctuations; however, in the calculation of the credit in order to make such surplus funds available, the commission shall attempt to create a balance in the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund that does not exceed, at the end of any state fiscal year, five percent (5%) of the projected amount of funds that will be available in the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund for distribution during such state fiscal year. (b)  From and after July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2010, a taxpayer shall be allowed as a credit towards the tax liability imposed by Chapter 51, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, on the amount of ad valorem taxes due during the taxable year on any private carrier of passengers and light carrier of property owned by him, an amount equal to four and twenty-five one-hundredths percent (4.25%) of the assessed value of the motor vehicle. (4)  Tax credits provided for by this section may be used against motor vehicle ad valorem taxes due under Chapter 51, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, at the time that a taxpayer pays motor vehicle ad valorem taxes to the county tax collector. (5)  Each receipt for motor vehicle ad valorem taxes shall clearly indicate that the credit provided for by this section is granted as a result of legislative action but shall not specify any particular legislative session. (6)  A taxpayer who is delinquent in the payment of motor vehicle ad valorem taxes to the extent that the penalty assessed pursuant to Section 27-51-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, has reached twenty-five percent (25%) of the ad valorem taxes due shall not be eligible to receive the tax credit authorized pursuant to this section. SECTION 3.  Section 27-51-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-51-105.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund, into which shall be deposited the monies specified in Section 27-65-75(10), (11) and (12), such monies as may be required to be transferred into such fund pursuant to Section 27-38-5, and such other monies as the Legislature may provide by appropriation.  The monies in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making payments to counties for the reduction in motor vehicle ad valorem tax revenues incurred by local taxing districts in the county as a result of the ad valorem tax credit for private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property that is provided for by Section 27-51-103. (2)  The Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund shall be administered by the State Tax Commission, and monies in the fund shall be expended upon appropriation by the Legislature.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the state fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 4.  Section 27-51-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-51-107.  (1)  On or before February 10, 1995, and the tenth day of each succeeding month thereafter, the State Tax Commission shall make payments from the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105 to the county tax collectors for distribution to the local taxing districts as reimbursement for motor vehicle ad valorem taxes that are lost during the preceding month as a result of the ad valorem tax credit for private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property that is provided for by Section 27-51-103.  The amount that each local taxing district will receive for each month under this subsection shall be determined by the State Tax Commission based on documentation provided by the tax collectors under guidelines established by the commission. (2)  On or before the twentieth day of the month that the payments from the commission under subsection (1) of this section are received, the county tax collectors shall remit the appropriate amount of such payments to the local taxing districts for which the county tax collector collects motor vehicle ad valorem taxes.  When an ad valorem tax credit that is allowed to a taxpayer is not paid by the commission in the payment for the month in which such credit is allowed, the tax collector shall remit the payment for such credit to the local taxing authority on or before the twentieth day of the month that payment for such credit is received from the commission. (3)  Funds received by local taxing districts from the payments under subsection (1) of this section shall be considered to be, and shall be used in the same manner as, the proceeds of motor vehicle ad valorem taxes. SECTION 5.  Section 27-65-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-65-75.  On or before the fifteenth day of each month, the revenue collected under the provisions of this chapter during the preceding month shall be paid and distributed as follows: (1)  (a)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 1993, eighteen percent (18%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before August 15, 1993, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  However, in the event the State Auditor issues a certificate of noncompliance pursuant to Section 21-35-31, the department shall withhold ten percent (10%) of the allocations and payments to the municipality that would otherwise be payable to the municipality under this paragraph (a) until such time that the department receives written notice of the cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance from the State Auditor. A municipal corporation, for the purpose of distributing the tax under this subsection, shall mean and include all incorporated cities, towns and villages. Monies allocated for distribution and credited to a municipal corporation under this paragraph may be pledged as security for a loan if the distribution received by the municipal corporation is otherwise authorized or required by law to be pledged as security for such a loan. In any county having a county seat that is not an incorporated municipality, the distribution provided under this subsection shall be made as though the county seat was an incorporated municipality; however, the distribution to the municipality shall be paid to the county treasury in which the municipality is located, and those funds shall be used for road, bridge and street construction or maintenance in the county. (b)  On or before August 15, 2006, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college. (c)  On or before August 15, 2018, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2019, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2019, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2020, four percent (4%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2023, six percent (6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2023, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twelve and six-tenths percent (12.6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215. (d)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (d), on or before the fifteenth day of the month that the diversion authorized by this section begins, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project area is located if: 1.  The county: a. Borders on the Mississippi Sound and the State of Alabama, or b.  Is Harrison County, Mississippi, and the project area is within a radius of two (2) miles from the intersection of Interstate 10 and Menge Avenue; 2.  The county has issued bonds under Section 21-45-9 to finance all or a portion of a redevelopment project in the redevelopment project area; 3.  Any debt service for the indebtedness incurred is outstanding; and 4.  A development with a value of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) or more is, or will be, located in the redevelopment area. (ii)  For a county that is eligible to receive funds under this paragraph (d), as determined by the department under this paragraph (d), from and after September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project is located, and twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) shall be allocated for distribution to that county. (iii)  Before any sales tax revenue may be allocated for distribution to a county under this paragraph (d), the county shall certify to the Department of Revenue that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met, the amount of bonded indebtedness that has been incurred by the county for the redevelopment project and the expected date the indebtedness incurred by the county will be satisfied. (iv)  The diversion of sales tax revenue authorized by this paragraph (d) shall begin the month following the month in which the Department of Revenue determines that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met.  The diversion shall end the month the indebtedness incurred by the county is satisfied.  All revenue received by the county under this paragraph (d) shall be deposited in the fund required to be created in the tax increment financing plan under Section 21-45-11 and be utilized solely to satisfy the indebtedness incurred by the county. (2)  On or before September 15, 1987, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, One Million One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($1,125,000.00) shall be allocated for distribution to municipal corporations as defined under subsection (1) of this section in the proportion that the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each such municipality during the preceding fiscal year bears to the total gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in municipalities statewide during the preceding fiscal year.  The Department of Revenue shall require all distributors of gasoline and diesel fuel to report to the department monthly the total number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by them to consumers and retailers in each municipality during the preceding month.  The Department of Revenue shall have the authority to promulgate such rules and regulations as is necessary to determine the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each municipality.  In determining the percentage allocation of funds under this subsection for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1987, and ending June 30, 1988, the Department of Revenue may consider gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold for a period of less than one (1) fiscal year. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "fiscal year" means the fiscal year beginning July 1 of a year. (3)  On or before September 15, 1987, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month, until the date specified in Section 65-39-35, the proceeds derived from contractors' taxes levied under Section 27-65-21 on contracts for the construction or reconstruction of highways designated under the highway program created under Section 65-3-97 shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be used to fund that highway program.  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall provide to the Department of Revenue such information as is necessary to determine the amount of proceeds to be distributed under this subsection. (4)  On or before August 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through July 15, 1999, from the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes as provided in Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a special fund designated as the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17. On or before August 15, 1999, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is the greater amount, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17.  After August 15, 2025, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1 and (iii), Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2025, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, and Six Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($6,500,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2026, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2027, and Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2027, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month.  From the amount of taxes paid into the special fund under this subsection and subsection (9) of this section, there shall be first deducted and paid the amount necessary to pay the expenses of the Office of State Aid Road Construction, as authorized by the Legislature for all other general and special fund agencies.  The remainder of the funds shall be allocated monthly to the several counties in accordance with the following formula: (a)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to all counties in equal shares; (b)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the total number of rural road miles in a county bears to the total number of rural road miles in all counties of the state; and (c)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the rural population of the county bears to the total rural population in all counties of the state, according to the latest federal decennial census. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes" means such taxes as defined in paragraph (f) of Section 27-5-101. The amount of funds allocated to any county under this subsection for any fiscal year after fiscal year 1994 shall not be less than the amount allocated to the county for fiscal year 1994. Any reference in the general laws of this state or the Mississippi Code of 1972 to Section 27-5-105 shall mean and be construed to refer and apply to subsection (4) of Section 27-65-75. (5)  On or before August 15, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Million Six Hundred Sixty-six Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-six Dollars ($1,666,666.00) shall be paid into the special fund known as the Education Enhancement Fund created and existing under the provisions of Section 37-61-33. (6)  An amount each month beginning August 15, 1983, through November 15, 1986, as specified in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983, shall be paid into the special fund known as the Correctional Facilities Construction Fund created in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983. (7)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2000, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited by the department into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35.  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00).  Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and three and seventeen one-hundredths percent (3.17%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00).  Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33. (8)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and twelve and seven-tenths percent (12.7%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33. (9)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) shall be paid into the State Aid Road Fund. (10)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 1995, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (11)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before February 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2) and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property as defined in Section 27-51-101 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (12)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(1) on retail sales of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101 and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of these vehicles, shall be deposited, after diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (13)  On or before July 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-22 that is derived from activities held on the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex shall be paid into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury and shall be expended upon legislative appropriation solely to defray the costs of repairs and renovation at the Trade Mart and Coliseum. (14)  On or before August 15, 1998, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2005, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39. On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2010, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until all debts or other obligations incurred by the Certified Cotton Growers Organization under the Mississippi Boll Weevil Management Act before January 1, 2007, are satisfied in full.  On or before August 15, 2010, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2011, fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).  On or before August 15, 2011, and each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). (15)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before September 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)2, and 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)3 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Telecommunications Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-38-7. (16)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a project as defined in Section 57-30-1 shall be deposited, after all diversions except the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section, into the Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-30-3. (b)  On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-26-1 through 57-26-5, shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Project Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-26-3. (17)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before April 15, 2002, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-23 on sales of parking services of parking garages and lots at airports shall be deposited, without diversion, into the special fund created under Section 27-5-101(d). (18)  [Repealed] (19)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2005, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and the revenue collected on the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (19), be deposited, after all diversions, into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9. (b)  For a municipality participating in the Economic Redevelopment Act created in Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section attributable to the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and attributable to the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall be deposited into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9, as follows: (i)  For the first six (6) years in which payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, one hundred percent (100%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (ii)  For the seventh year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, eighty percent (80%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iii)  For the eighth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, seventy percent (70%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iv)  For the ninth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, sixty percent (60%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; and (v)  For the tenth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be deposited into the fund. (20)  On or before January 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5 shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-28-3. (21)  (a)  On or before April 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through June 15, 2013, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-101-3. (b)  On or before July 15, 2013, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Job Training Grant Fund created in Section 57-1-451. (22)  On or before June 1, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter until December 31, 2057, an amount determined annually by the Mississippi Development Authority of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-125-3.  This amount shall be based on estimated payments due within the upcoming year to construction contractors pursuant to construction contracts subject to the tax imposed by Section 27-65-21 for construction to be performed on the project site of a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) for the coming year. (23)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 2009, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-201 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (24)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2019, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2020, one percent (1%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2021, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2021, and each month thereafter, three percent (3%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  The revenue diverted pursuant to this subsection shall not be available for expenditure until February 1, 2020. (b)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) must provide an annual report to the Legislature indicating the amount of funds deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, and a detailed record of how the funds are spent. (25)  The remainder of the amounts collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund. (26)  (a)  It shall be the duty of the municipal officials of any municipality that expands its limits, or of any community that incorporates as a municipality, to notify the commissioner of that action thirty (30) days before the effective date.  Failure to so notify the commissioner shall cause the municipality to forfeit the revenue that it would have been entitled to receive during this period of time when the commissioner had no knowledge of the action. (b)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to any municipality or any overpayment of tax is recovered by the taxpayer, the commissioner may make correction and adjust the error or overpayment with the municipality by withholding the necessary funds from any later payment to be made to the municipality. (ii)  Subject to the provisions of Sections 27-65-51 and 27-65-53, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to a municipality under subsection (1) of this section for a period of three (3) years or more, the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of three (3) years beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement.  However, if during such period, a municipality provides written notice to the Department of Revenue indicating the erroneous disbursement of funds, then the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of one (1) year beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.